California, session 20252026, AB2402.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1812.86 of the Civil Code is amended to read:1812.86. (a) A contract for health studio services shall not require payment by the person receiving the services or the use of the facilities of a total amount in excess of the amount specified in paragraph (1) or (2).(1) The limit specified in subdivision (a) shall, on and after January 1, 2006, be three thousand dollars ($3,000), inclusive of initiation or initial membership fees and exclusive of interest or finance charges.(2) The limit in subdivision (a) shall, on and after January 1, 2010, be four thousand four hundred dollars ($4,400), inclusive of initiation or initial membership fees and exclusive of interest or finance charges.(b) (1) A contract for health studio services with a multiservice health club studio shall be exempt from the limit specified in subdivision (a).(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “multiservice health club studio” means a studio that offers three or more of the following amenities:(A) Digital platform services. services, such as on-demand classes.(B) Individualized training programing.(C) Fitness instructor training. training or certification.(D) Group Recurring group fitness classes.(E) Coworking space.(F) Childcare.(G) Swimming pool. pool or pools.(H) Steam room.(I) Laundry services.(J) Onsite food and beverage.(K) Spa treatments.(L) Adult or youth sports programming.(M) Locker rooms.